Washington statutes.
RCW 44.28.065

Legislative auditor—Duties.

The legislative auditor shall:

(1) Establish and manage the office of the joint legislative audit and review committee to carry out the functions of this chapter;

(2) Direct the audit and review functions described in this chapter and ensure that performance audits are performed in accordance with the "Government Auditing Standards" published by the comptroller general of the United States as applicable to the scope of the audit;

(3) Make findings and recommendations to the joint committee and under its direction to the committees of the state legislature concerning the organization and operation of state agencies and the expenditure of state funds by units of local government;

(4) Subject to RCW 44.04.260, in consultation with and with the approval of the executive committee, hire staff necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Subject to RCW 44.04.260, employee salaries, other than the legislative auditor, shall be set by the legislative auditor with the approval of the executive committee;

(5) Assist the several standing committees of the house and senate in consideration of legislation affecting state departments and their efficiency; appear before other legislative committees; and assist any other legislative committee upon instruction by the joint legislative audit and review committee;

(6) Provide the legislature with information obtained under the direction of the joint legislative audit and review committee;

(7) Maintain a record of all work performed by the legislative auditor under the direction of the joint legislative audit and review committee and keep and make available all documents, data, and reports submitted to the legislative auditor by any legislative committee.

[ 2001 c 259 s 4; 1996 c 288 s 8; 1975 1st ex.s. c 293 s 17; 1955 c 206 s 9; 1951 c 43 s 11. Formerly RCW 44.28.140.]